skt_gen/Sentence/UNKN_PDGM/unknwn_sup.dix
<pardef n="/in__nm">
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>I</l><r>in<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:puM"/><s n="viBakwiH:1"/><s n="vacanam:eka"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*[rR][aAiIuUqQeEoOhyvrkKgGfpPbBm]+</re>
<p><l>iNO</l><r>in<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:puM"/><s n="viBakwiH:1"/><s n="vacanam:xvi"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*[rR][a-zA-Z]*[lcCjJFtTdDNwWxXnSs][a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>inO</l><r>in<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:puM"/><s n="viBakwiH:1"/><s n="vacanam:xvi"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-qs-zA-QS-Z]*</re>
<p><l>inO</l><r>in<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:puM"/><s n="viBakwiH:1"/><s n="vacanam:xvi"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*[rR][aAiIuUqQeEoOhyvrkKgGfpPbBm]+</re>
<p><l>iNaH</l><r>in<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:puM"/><s n="viBakwiH:1"/><s n="vacanam:bahu"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*[rR][a-zA-Z]*[lcCjJFtTdDNwWxXnSs][a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>inaH</l><r>in<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:puM"/><s n="viBakwiH:1"/><s n="vacanam:bahu"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-qs-zA-QS-Z]*</re>
<p><l>inaH</l><r>in<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:puM"/><s n="viBakwiH:1"/><s n="vacanam:bahu"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>

<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*[rR][aAiIuUqQeEoOhyvrkKgGfpPbBm]+</re>
<p><l>iNam</l><r>in<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:puM"/><s n="viBakwiH:2"/><s n="vacanam:eka"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*[rR][a-zA-Z]*[lcCjJFtTdDNwWxXnSs][a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>inam</l><r>in<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:puM"/><s n="viBakwiH:2"/><s n="vacanam:eka"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-qs-zA-QS-Z]*</re>
<p><l>inam</l><r>in<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:puM"/><s n="viBakwiH:2"/><s n="vacanam:eka"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*[rR][aAiIuUqQeEoOhyvrkKgGfpPbBm]+</re>
<p><l>iNO</l><r>in<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:puM"/><s n="viBakwiH:2"/><s n="vacanam:xvi"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*[rR][a-zA-Z]*[lcCjJFtTdDNwWxXnSs][a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>inO</l><r>in<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:puM"/><s n="viBakwiH:2"/><s n="vacanam:xvi"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-qs-zA-QS-Z]*</re>
<p><l>inO</l><r>in<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:puM"/><s n="viBakwiH:2"/><s n="vacanam:xvi"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*[rR][aAiIuUqQeEoOhyvrkKgGfpPbBm]+</re>
<p><l>iNaH</l><r>in<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:puM"/><s n="viBakwiH:2"/><s n="vacanam:bahu"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*[rR][a-zA-Z]*[lcCjJFtTdDNwWxXnSs][a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>inaH</l><r>in<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:puM"/><s n="viBakwiH:2"/><s n="vacanam:bahu"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-qs-zA-QS-Z]*</re>
<p><l>inaH</l><r>in<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:puM"/><s n="viBakwiH:2"/><s n="vacanam:bahu"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>

<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*[rR][aAiIuUqQeEoOhyvrkKgGfpPbBm]+</re>
<p><l>iNA</l><r>in<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:puM"/><s n="viBakwiH:3"/><s n="vacanam:eka"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*[rR][a-zA-Z]*[lcCjJFtTdDNwWxXnSs][a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>inA</l><r>in<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:puM"/><s n="viBakwiH:3"/><s n="vacanam:eka"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-qs-zA-QS-Z]*</re>
<p><l>inA</l><r>in<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:puM"/><s n="viBakwiH:3"/><s n="vacanam:eka"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>iByAm</l><r>in<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:puM"/><s n="viBakwiH:3"/><s n="vacanam:xvi"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>iBiH</l><r>in<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:puM"/><s n="viBakwiH:3"/><s n="vacanam:bahu"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>

<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*[rR][aAiIuUqQeEoOhyvrkKgGfpPbBm]+</re>
<p><l>iNe</l><r>in<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:puM"/><s n="viBakwiH:4"/><s n="vacanam:eka"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*[rR][a-zA-Z]*[lcCjJFtTdDNwWxXnSs][a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>ine</l><r>in<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:puM"/><s n="viBakwiH:4"/><s n="vacanam:eka"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-qs-zA-QS-Z]*</re>
<p><l>ine</l><r>in<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:puM"/><s n="viBakwiH:4"/><s n="vacanam:eka"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>iByAm</l><r>in<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:puM"/><s n="viBakwiH:4"/><s n="vacanam:xvi"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>iByaH</l><r>in<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:puM"/><s n="viBakwiH:4"/><s n="vacanam:bahu"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>

<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*[rR][aAiIuUqQeEoOhyvrkKgGfpPbBm]+</re>
<p><l>iNaH</l><r>in<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:puM"/><s n="viBakwiH:5"/><s n="vacanam:eka"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*[rR][a-zA-Z]*[lcCjJFtTdDNwWxXnSs][a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>inaH</l><r>in<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:puM"/><s n="viBakwiH:5"/><s n="vacanam:eka"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-qs-zA-QS-Z]*</re>
<p><l>inaH</l><r>in<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:puM"/><s n="viBakwiH:5"/><s n="vacanam:eka"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>iByAm</l><r>in<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:puM"/><s n="viBakwiH:5"/><s n="vacanam:xvi"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>iByaH</l><r>in<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:puM"/><s n="viBakwiH:5"/><s n="vacanam:bahu"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>

<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*[rR][aAiIuUqQeEoOhyvrkKgGfpPbBm]+</re>
<p><l>iNaH</l><r>in<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:puM"/><s n="viBakwiH:6"/><s n="vacanam:eka"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*[rR][a-zA-Z]*[lcCjJFtTdDNwWxXnSs][a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>inaH</l><r>in<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:puM"/><s n="viBakwiH:6"/><s n="vacanam:eka"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-qs-zA-QS-Z]*</re>
<p><l>inaH</l><r>in<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:puM"/><s n="viBakwiH:6"/><s n="vacanam:eka"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*[rR][aAiIuUqQeEoOhyvrkKgGfpPbBm]+</re>
<p><l>iNoH</l><r>in<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:puM"/><s n="viBakwiH:6"/><s n="vacanam:xvi"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*[rR][a-zA-Z]*[lcCjJFtTdDNwWxXnSs][a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>inoH</l><r>in<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:puM"/><s n="viBakwiH:6"/><s n="vacanam:xvi"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-qs-zA-QS-Z]*</re>
<p><l>inoH</l><r>in<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:puM"/><s n="viBakwiH:6"/><s n="vacanam:xvi"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*[rR][aAiIuUqQeEoOhyvrkKgGfpPbBm]+</re>
<p><l>iNAm</l><r>in<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:puM"/><s n="viBakwiH:6"/><s n="vacanam:bahu"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*[rR][a-zA-Z]*[lcCjJFtTdDNwWxXnSs][a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>inAm</l><r>in<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:puM"/><s n="viBakwiH:6"/><s n="vacanam:bahu"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-qs-zA-QS-Z]*</re>
<p><l>inAm</l><r>in<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:puM"/><s n="viBakwiH:6"/><s n="vacanam:bahu"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>

<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*[rR][aAiIuUqQeEoOhyvrkKgGfpPbBm]+</re>
<p><l>iNi</l><r>in<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:puM"/><s n="viBakwiH:7"/><s n="vacanam:eka"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*[rR][a-zA-Z]*[lcCjJFtTdDNwWxXnSs][a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>ini</l><r>in<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:puM"/><s n="viBakwiH:7"/><s n="vacanam:eka"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-qs-zA-QS-Z]*</re>
<p><l>ini</l><r>in<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:puM"/><s n="viBakwiH:7"/><s n="vacanam:eka"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*[rR][aAiIuUqQeEoOhyvrkKgGfpPbBm]+</re>
<p><l>iNoH</l><r>in<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:puM"/><s n="viBakwiH:7"/><s n="vacanam:xvi"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*[rR][a-zA-Z]*[lcCjJFtTdDNwWxXnSs][a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>inoH</l><r>in<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:puM"/><s n="viBakwiH:7"/><s n="vacanam:xvi"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-qs-zA-QS-Z]*</re>
<p><l>inoH</l><r>in<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:puM"/><s n="viBakwiH:7"/><s n="vacanam:xvi"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*[rR][aAiIuUqQeEoOhyvrkKgGfpPbBm]+</re>
<p><l>iRu</l><r>in<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:puM"/><s n="viBakwiH:7"/><s n="vacanam:bahu"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>

    <e lm="" r="RL"><i></i><par n="/in__nm"/></e>
